Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Unemployment aid for hourly workers over the summer term. new text end new text begin (a) For school unemployment aid for fiscal years 2026 and 2027 under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.995: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation is subject to the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.995. new text end